Montana, session 2025, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-15-1508, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-1508. Appointments to board of public education and board of regents -- conditions --
vacancy. (1) Appointments to the board of public education and to the board of regents are subject to the
following qualifications:
(a) Not more than four may be from one district provided for in 2-15-156.
(b) Not more than four may be affiliated with the same political party.
(c) The terms of members appointed to each board are 7 years except as provided in subsection
(3).
(d) When a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a member for the remainder of the term of
the incumbent, and the appointment must preserve the balance required by subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b).
(e) A person may not be appointed to concurrent memberships on the board of public education
and the board of regents.
(2) An appointed member of either board shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of
office and file it with the secretary of state before the person may serve as a member of either board.
(3) (a) One seat of the appointed members on the board of regents is reserved for membership by
a student appointed by the governor. The student must be registered as a full-time student at a unit of higher
education under jurisdiction of the board of regents. The length of term of the student member is 1 year. The
term begins July 1 and ends June 30. The student regent may be reappointed to succeeding terms subject to
subsection (3)(b). The provisions of subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) do not apply to the student member and may
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 210

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 210.1
not affect the balance of the remaining appointive membership on the board of regents.
(b) The governor shall appoint the student provided for in subsection (3)(a) based upon a
nomination provided by a student organization designated by the board of regents. The student organization
shall nominate no fewer than three qualified students. If the governor finds that none of the students nominated
are acceptable, the governor may request a new slate of nominees. Nominations must be forwarded to the
governor in March immediately preceding the end of a regular term, and the governor shall make the
appointment before the end of the succeeding June. In the event of a vacancy, a replacement must be
appointed as soon as is practicable and in the same manner as the original appointment."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Transition. The governor shall appoint a member to the board of regents
on July 1, 2025, for a term ending January 31, 2030, to fill the vacant regent position created by eliminating the
student regent position from statute in [section 1]. On February 1, 2030, the governor shall appoint a member to
serve a full 7-year term as provided in [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 210